District of Columbia statutes.
7-2107

Provisional and restricted licensure.

(a)

As an alternative to denial, nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation of a license, whenever a facility has numerous deficiencies or a serious single deficiency with respect to the standards established under § 7-2103(a)(2) through (4), the Mayor may:

(1)

Issue a provisional license if the facility is taking appropriate corrective actions in accordance with a mutually agreed-upon timetable; or

(2)

Issue a restricted license that prohibits the facility from accepting new residents or providing certain specified services that it would otherwise be authorized to provide, if appropriate corrective actions are not forthcoming.

(b)

As provided in § 7-2105(a), provisional licenses may be issued to new facilities or licensees in order to afford the Mayor sufficient time and evidence to evaluate whether a new facility or licensee is capable of complying with this chapter, the rules issued pursuant to this chapter, and other applicable laws.

(c)

Provisional licenses may be granted for a period not to exceed 90 days and may be renewed no more than once.

History

Aug. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-139, § 8, 33 DCR 3804

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-2105.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-807.